Vermont, session 2025-2026, H161.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. PURPOSE
The purpose of this act is to ensure equitable access to the parts, tools, and
documentation that are necessary for independent repair providers and owners
to perform timely repair of agricultural, electronic, and forestry equipment in a
safe, secure, reliable, and sustainable manner.
Sec. 2. SHORT TITLE
This act may be cited as the Fair Repair Act.
VT LEG #379480 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.161
2025 Page 2 of 10
Sec. 3. 9 V.S.A. chapter 106 is added to read:
CHAPTER 106. VERMONT FAIR REPAIR ACT
§ 4051. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Agricultural equipment” means a device, part of a device, or an
attachment to a device used principally off road and designed principally for an
agricultural purpose, including a tractor, trailer, or combine; implements for
tillage, planting, or cultivation; and other equipment principally associated
with livestock or crop production, horticulture, or floriculture.
(2)(A) “Authorized repair provider” means an individual or business
that has an arrangement with the original equipment manufacturer under which
the original equipment manufacturer grants to the individual or business a
license to use a trade name, service mark, or other proprietary identifier for the
purposes of offering the services of diagnosis, maintenance, or complete repair
of equipment under the name of the original equipment manufacturer or other
arrangement with the original equipment manufacturer to offer such services
on behalf of the original equipment manufacturer.
(B) An original equipment manufacturer that offers the services of
diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of its own equipment shall be considered an
authorized repair provider with respect to such equipment.
(3) “Documentation” means any manual, diagram, reporting output,
service code description, schematic diagram, security code, password, or other
VT LEG #379480 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.161
2025 Page 3 of 10
guidance or information, whether in an electronic or tangible format, used to
perform the services of diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of agricultural,
electronic, or forestry equipment.
(4) “Embedded software” means any programmable software
instructions delivered with, or loaded onto, equipment or a part of equipment
to allow the equipment or part to operate or communicate with other computer
hardware. Embedded software includes all relevant patches and fixes that the
manufacturer makes for the purposes of diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of
equipment.
(5) “Electronic equipment” means digital electronic equipment or a part
for such equipment originally manufactured for distribution and sale in the
United States.
(6) “Forestry equipment” means nondivisible equipment, implements,
accessories, and contrivances used principally off road and in harvesting
timber or for on-site processing of wood forest products, including equipment
used to construct, maintain, or install infrastructure necessary to and associated
with a logging operation.
(7) “Independent repair provider” means a person operating in this State,
either through a physical business location or through a mobile service that
offers on-site repairs in the State, that does not have an arrangement described
in subdivision (2) of this section with an original equipment manufacturer and
VT LEG #379480 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.161
2025 Page 4 of 10
that is engaged in the services of diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of
agricultural, electronic, or forestry equipment.
(8) “Medical device” means an instrument, apparatus, implement,
machine, contrivance, implant, or other similar or related article, including a
component part or accessory, as defined in the federal Food, Drug, and
Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. § 321, as amended, that is intended for use in the
diagnosis of disease or other conditions or in the cure, mitigation, treatment, or
prevention of disease in humans or other animals.
(9) “Motor vehicle” means any vehicle that is designed for transporting
persons or property on a street or highway and is certified by the motor vehicle
manufacturer under all applicable federal safety and emissions standards and
requirements for distribution and sale in the United States. The term does not
include a motorcycle or a recreational vehicle or manufactured home equipped
for habitation.
(10) “Motor vehicle dealer” means a person who, in the ordinary course
of business, is engaged in the business of selling or leasing new motor vehicles
to a person pursuant to a franchise agreement and who is engaged in the
diagnosis, service, maintenance, or repair of motor vehicles or motor vehicle
engines pursuant to such franchise agreement.
(11) “Motor vehicle manufacturer” means a person engaged in the
business of manufacturing or assembling new motor vehicles.
VT LEG #379480 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.161
2025 Page 5 of 10
(12) “Original equipment manufacturer” means a person who, in the
ordinary course of business, is engaged in the business of selling or leasing
new agricultural, electronic, or forestry equipment manufactured by or on
behalf of the person.
(13) “Owner” means a person who owns or leases agricultural,
electronic, or forestry equipment used in this State;
(14) “Part” means any replacement part, either new or used, made
available by an original equipment manufacturer for purposes of effecting the
services of maintenance or repair of agricultural, electronic, or forestry
equipment manufactured by or on behalf of, sold or otherwise supplied by, the
original equipment manufacturer.
(15) “Parts pairing” means the practice by original equipment
manufacturers of using software to identify component parts through a unique
identifier.
(16) “Repair” means to maintain, diagnose, or fix agricultural,
electronic, or forestry equipment, resulting in the equipment being restored to
its fully functional condition, including any updates. “Repair” does not include
the ability to download or access the source code of any embedded software or
code, unless doing so is required to restore the equipment to its fully functional
condition, including any updates.
(17) “Tools” means any software program, hardware implement, or
other apparatus used for diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of agricultural,
VT LEG #379480 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.161
2025 Page 6 of 10
electronic, or forestry equipment, including software or other mechanisms that
provision, program, or require parts pairing; calibrate functionality; or perform
any other function required to bring the product back to fully functional
condition, including any updates.
(18) “Trade secret” has the same meaning as provided in 18 U.S.C.
§ 1839.
§ 4052. REQUIREMENTS
(a) Duty to make available parts, tools, and documentation.
(1) An original equipment manufacturer shall offer for sale or otherwise
make available to an independent repair provider or owner the parts, tools, and
documentation that the original equipment manufacturer offers for sale or
otherwise makes available to an authorized repair provider.
(2) If agricultural, electronic, or forestry equipment includes an
electronic security lock or other security-related function that must be
unlocked, enabled, or disabled to perform diagnosis, maintenance, or repair of
the equipment, an original equipment manufacturer shall make available to an
independent repair provider or owner any parts, tools, and documentation
necessary to unlock or disable the function and to reset the lock or function
after the diagnosis, maintenance, or repair is complete.
(3) An original equipment manufacturer may satisfy its obligation to
make parts, tools, and documentation available to an independent repair
VT LEG #379480 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.161
2025 Page 7 of 10
provider or owner through an authorized repair provider that consents to sell or
make available parts, tools, or documentation on behalf of the manufacturer.
(b) Unreasonable costs or burdens prohibited. Under the terms governing
the sale or provision of parts, tools, and documentation pursuant to subsection
(a) of this section, an original equipment manufacturer shall not impose on an
independent repair provider or owner an additional cost or burden that is not
reasonably necessary within the ordinary course of business or is designed to
be an impediment on the independent repair provider or owner, including:
(1) a substantial obligation to use, or a restriction on the use of, the
parts, tools, or documentation necessary to diagnose, maintain, or repair
agricultural, electronic, or forestry equipment;
(2) a condition that the independent repair provider or owner become an
authorized repair provider of the original equipment manufacturer;
(3) a requirement that a part, tool, or documentation be registered,
paired with, or approved by the original equipment manufacturer or an
authorized repair provider before the part, tool, or documentation is
operational; or
(4) an additional burden or material change that adversely affects the
timeliness or method of delivering parts, tools, or documentation.
§ 4053. APPLICATION; LIMITATIONS
(a) This chapter does not:
VT LEG #379480 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.161
2025 Page 8 of 10
(1) require an original equipment manufacturer to divulge a trade secret
to an independent repair provider or owner; or
(2) alter the terms of:
(A) any arrangement described in subdivision 4051(2)(A) of this title
in force between an authorized repair provider and an original equipment
manufacturer, including the performance or provision of warranty or recall
repair work by an authorized repair provider on behalf of an original
equipment manufacturer pursuant to such arrangement, except that any
provision governing such an arrangement that purports to waive, avoid,
restrict, or limit the original equipment manufacturer’s obligations to comply
with this chapter is void and unenforceable; or
(B) a lease of agricultural, electronic, or forestry equipment between
an owner and another person.
(b) An independent repair provider or owner shall not:
(1) modify agricultural or forestry equipment to temporarily deactivate
safety notification systems, except as necessary to provide diagnosis,
maintenance, or repair services; or
(2) obtain or use parts, tools, or documentation to evade or violate
emissions, copyright, trademark, or patent laws or to engage in any other
illegal activity.
(c)(1) Subject to subdivision (2) of this subsection, original equipment
manufacturers and authorized repair providers are not liable for negligent
VT LEG #379480 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.161
2025 Page 9 of 10
repairs completed by independent repair providers or owners, including
negligent repairs that cause:
(A) damage to agricultural, electronic, or forestry equipment that
occurs during such repairs; and
(B) an inability to use, or the reduced functionality of, agricultural,
electronic, or forestry equipment resulting from the negligent repair.
(2) A repair completed by an independent repair provider or owner
resulting in damage to equipment or the reduced functionality of equipment as
set forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection that was caused by a defective or
faulty part, tool, or documentation provided by the original equipment
manufacturer shall not be considered a negligent repair.
(d) In the event that federal law preempts part of the activity regulated by
this chapter, this chapter shall be construed to regulate activity that has not
been preempted.
(e) If an original equipment manufacturer is a party to a memorandum of
understanding that is related to the right to repair of agricultural, electronic, or
forestry equipment, the original equipment manufacturer shall still be obligated
to meet the requirements established in this chapter
§ 4054. EXCLUSIONS
(a) This chapter shall not apply to a motor vehicle manufacturer, a product
or service of a motor vehicle manufacturer, or a motor vehicle dealer.
VT LEG #379480 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.161
2025 Page 10 of 10
(b) This chapter shall not require a manufacturer of a medical device to
implement a provision of this chapter that is not permitted under the federal
Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act or any other federal law that supersedes this
section.
§ 4055. ATTORNEY GENERAL ENFORCEMENT; NOTICE
(a) A person who violates a provision of this chapter commits an unfair and
deceptive act in trade and commerce in violation of section 2453 of this title.
(b) The Attorney General has the same authority to make rules, conduct
civil investigations, enter into assurances of discontinuance, and bring civil
actions as provided under chapter 63, subchapter 1 of this title.
(c) The Attorney General shall be notified in writing by the original
equipment manufacturer not later than 30 days after a memorandum of
understanding expires or has been terminated, withdrawn, or canceled by an
original equipment manufacturer subject to this chapter.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
VT LEG #379480 v.1